Florida, session 2026, SB530.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.âPresent subsections (1) through (6) of section 37 24.103, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (2) 38 through (7), respectively, a new subsection (1) is added to that 39 section, and present subsections (2) and (4) of that section are 40 amended, to read: 41 24.103âDefinitions.âAs used in this act: 42 (1)ââBall machineâ means a device that mechanically mixes a 43 set of numbered balls and then randomly draws from that mix to 44 determine the winning numbers for a specific game. 45 (3)(2)ââMajor procurementâ means a procurement for a 46 contract for the printing of tickets for use in any lottery 47 game, consultation services for the startup of the lottery, any 48 goods or services involving the official recording for lottery 49 game play purposes of a playerâs selections in any lottery game 50 involving player selections, any goods or services involving the 51 receiving of a playerâs selection directly from a player in any 52 lottery game involving player selections, any goods or services 53 involving the drawing, determination, or generation of winners 54 in any lottery game, the security report services provided for 55 in this act, or any goods and services relating to marketing and 56 promotion which exceed a value of $25,000. 57 (5)(4)ââRetailerâ means the department or a person who 58 sells lottery tickets on behalf of the department pursuant to a 59 contract. 60 Section 2.âPresent paragraphs (i) and (j) of subsection (9) 61 of section 24.105, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 62 paragraphs (j) and (k), respectively, a new paragraph (i) is 63 added to that subsection, and paragraphs (a) and (d) of 64 subsection (9) and subsection (17) of that section are amended, 65 to read: 66 24.105âPowers and duties of department.âThe department 67 shall: 68 (9)âAdopt rules governing the establishment and operation 69 of the state lottery, including: 70 (a)âThe type of lottery games to be conducted, except that: 71 1.âThe No name of an elected official may not shall appear 72 on the ticket or play slip of any lottery game or on any prize 73 or on any instrument used for the payment of prizes, unless such 74 prize is in the form of a state warrant. 75 2.âNo Coins or currency may not shall be dispensed from any 76 electronic computer terminal or device used in any lottery game. 77 3.âOther than as specifically provided in s. 24.112, a no 78 terminal or device may not be used for any lottery game which 79 may be operated solely by the player without the assistance of 80 the retailer. 81 (d)âThe method of selecting winning tickets. However, if a 82 lottery game involves the use of a ball machine to conduct a 83 drawing, the drawing must shall be public and witnessed by an 84 accountant employed by an independent certified public 85 accounting firm. The department shall inspect the equipment used 86 in the drawing shall be inspected before and after the drawing. 87 (i)âThe acceptable forms of payment for ticket purchases. 88 (17)âHave the authority to Enter into agreements with other 89 states for the operation and promotion of a multistate lottery 90 if such agreements are in the best interest of the state 91 lottery. The authority conferred by this subsection is not 92 effective until 1 year after the first day of lottery ticket 93 sales. 94 Section 3.âSubsections (6) and (7) of section 24.108, 95 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 96 24.108âDivision of Security; duties; security report.â 97 (6)âThe division shall monitor ticket validation and 98 lottery drawings where ball machines are used to select winning 99 numbers. 100 (7)(a)âBy July 1, 2027, and once every 2 years thereafter 101 After the first full year of sales of tickets to the public, or 102 sooner if the secretary deems necessary, the department shall 103 engage an independent firm experienced in security procedures, 104 including, but not limited to, computer security and systems 105 security, to conduct a comprehensive study and evaluation of all 106 aspects of security in the operation of the department. 107 (b)âThe portion of the security report containing the 108 overall evaluation of the department in terms of each aspect of 109 security must shall be presented to the Governor, the President 110 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 111 The portion of the security report containing specific 112 recommendations is shall be confidential and must shall be 113 presented only to the secretary, the Governor, and the Auditor 114 General; however, upon certification that such information is 115 necessary for the purpose of effecting legislative changes, such 116 information must shall be disclosed to the President of the 117 Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, who may 118 disclose such information to members of the Legislature and 119 legislative staff as necessary to effect such purpose. However, 120 any person who receives a copy of such information or other 121 information which is confidential pursuant to this act or rule 122 of the department shall maintain its confidentiality. The 123 confidential portion of the report is exempt from the provisions 124 of s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 125 (c)âThereafter, similar studies of security shall be 126 conducted as the department deems appropriate but at least once 127 every 2 years. 128 Section 4.âSubsection (2) of section 24.111, Florida 129 Statutes, is amended to read: 130 24.111âVendors; disclosure and contract requirements.â 131 (2)âThe department shall investigate the financial 132 responsibility, security, and integrity of each vendor with 133 which it intends to negotiate a contract for major procurement. 134 Such investigation may include an investigation of the financial 135 responsibility, security, and integrity of any or all persons 136 whose names and addresses are required to be disclosed pursuant 137 to paragraph (a). Any person who submits a bid, a proposal, or 138 an offer as part of a major procurement must, at the time of 139 submitting such bid, proposal, or offer, provide the following: 140 (a)âA disclosure of the vendorâs name and address and, as 141 applicable, the name and address and any additional disclosures 142 necessary for an investigation of the financial responsibility, 143 security, and integrity of the following: 144 1.âIf the vendor is a corporation, the officers, directors, 145 and each stockholder in such corporation; except that, in the 146 case of owners of equity securities of a publicly traded 147 corporation, only the names and addresses of those known to the 148 corporation to own beneficially 5 percent or more of such 149 securities need be disclosed. 150 2.âIf the vendor is a trust, the trustee and all persons 151 entitled to receive income or benefit from the trust. 152 3.âIf the vendor is an association, the members, officers, 153 and directors. 154 4.âIf the vendor is a partnership or joint venture, all of 155 the general partners, limited partners, or joint venturers. 156 157 If the vendor subcontracts any substantial portion of the work 158 to be performed to a subcontractor, the vendor must shall 159 disclose all of the information required by this paragraph for 160 the subcontractor as if the subcontractor were itself a vendor. 161 (b)âA disclosure of all the states and jurisdictions in 162 which the vendor does business and of the nature of that 163 business for each such state or jurisdiction. 164 (c)âA disclosure of all the states and jurisdictions in 165 which the vendor has contracts to supply gaming goods or 166 services, including, but not limited to, lottery goods and 167 services, and of the nature of the goods or services involved 168 for each such state or jurisdiction. 169 (d)âA disclosure of all the states and jurisdictions in 170 which the vendor has applied for, has sought renewal of, has 171 received, has been denied, has pending, or has had revoked a 172 gaming license or contract of any kind and of the disposition of 173 such in each such state or jurisdiction. If any gaming license 174 or contract has been revoked or has not been renewed or any 175 gaming license or contract application has been either denied or 176 is pending and has remained pending for more than 6 months, all 177 of the facts and circumstances underlying this failure to 178 receive such a license must be disclosed. 179 (e)âA disclosure of the details of any conviction or 180 judgment of a state or federal court of the vendor of any felony 181 or any other criminal offense other than a traffic violation. 182 (f)âA disclosure of the details of any bankruptcy, 183 insolvency, reorganization, or any pending litigation of the 184 vendor. 185 (g)âSuch additional disclosures and information as the 186 department may determine to be appropriate for the procurement 187 involved. 188 (h)âThe department shall lease all vending machines that 189 dispense online lottery tickets, instant lottery tickets, or 190 both online and instant lottery tickets. 191 (i)âThe department will require a performance bond for the 192 duration of the contract. 193 194 The department may shall not contract with any vendor who fails 195 to make the disclosures required by this subsection, and any 196 contract with a vendor who has failed to make the required 197 disclosures is shall be unenforceable. Any contract with any 198 vendor who does not comply with such requirements for 199 periodically updating such disclosures during the tenure of such 200 contract as may be specified in such contract may be terminated 201 by the department. This subsection must shall be construed 202 broadly and liberally to achieve the ends of full disclosure of 203 all information necessary to allow for a full and complete 204 evaluation by the department of the competence, integrity, 205 background, and character of vendors for major procurements. 206 Section 5.âSubsection (9) and paragraph (a) of subsection 207 (15) of section 24.112, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 208 24.112âRetailers of lottery tickets; authorization of 209 vending machines to dispense lottery tickets.â 210 (9)(a)âThe department may require every retailer to post an 211 appropriate bond as determined by the department, using an 212 insurance company acceptable to the department, in an amount not 213 to exceed three times twice the average lottery ticket sales of 214 the retailer for the period within which the retailer is 215 required to remit lottery funds to the department. For the first 216 90 days of sales of a new retailer, the amount of the bond may 217 not exceed three times twice the average estimated lottery 218 ticket sales for the period within which the retailer is 219 required to remit lottery funds to the department. This 220 paragraph does shall not apply to lottery tickets which are 221 prepaid by the retailer. 222 (b)âIn lieu of such bond, the department may do any of the 223 following: 224 1.âPurchase blanket bonds covering all or selected 225 retailers. 226 2.âor may Allow a retailer to deposit and maintain with the 227 Chief Financial Officer securities that are interest bearing or 228 accruing and that, with the exception of those specified in sub 229 subparagraphs a. and b. subparagraphs 1. and 2., are rated in 230 one of the four highest classifications by an established 231 nationally recognized investment rating service. Securities 232 eligible under this subparagraph are paragraph shall be limited 233 to: 234 a.1.âCertificates of deposit issued by solvent banks or 235 savings associations organized and existing under the laws of 236 this state or under the laws of the United States and having 237 their principal place of business in this state. 238 b.2.âUnited States bonds, notes, and bills for which the 239 full faith and credit of the government of the United States is 240 pledged for the payment of principal and interest. 241 c.3.âGeneral obligation bonds and notes of any political 242 subdivision of the state. 243 d.4.âCorporate bonds of any corporation that is not an 244 affiliate or subsidiary of the depositor. 245 3.âAllow a retailer to remit funds to the department for 246 deposit in an interest-bearing bank account held by the 247 department. 248 249 Such securities must shall be held in trust and shall have at 250 all times a market value at least equal to an amount required by 251 the department. 252 (15)âA vending machine may be used to dispense online 253 lottery tickets, instant lottery tickets, or both online and 254 instant lottery tickets. 255 (a)âThe vending machine must: 256 1.âDispense a lottery ticket following receipt of payment 257 from after a purchaser via inserts a coin, or currency, or a 258 noncredit, cashless payment method authorized by the department; 259 in the machine. 260 2.âBe capable of being electronically deactivated for a 261 period of 5 minutes or more; and. 262 3.âBe designed to prevent its use for any purpose other 263 than dispensing a lottery ticket. 264 Section 6.âSubsection (2) of section 24.116, Florida 265 Statutes, is amended to read: 266 24.116âUnlawful purchase of lottery tickets; penalty.â 267 (2)âAn No officer or employee of the department or any 268 relative living in the same household with such officer or 269 employee may not purchase a lottery ticket. Sworn law 270 enforcement officers employed by the Division of Security may 271 purchase lottery tickets and present lottery tickets to a 272 lottery retailer to claim a prize when such purchase or 273 presentation of lottery tickets is necessary for the performance 274 of the officersâ official duties, including, but not limited to, 275 compliance operations and investigations. 276 Section 7.âSubsection (3) of section 24.118, Florida 277 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (5) and (6) are added to 278 that section, to read: 279 24.118âOther prohibited acts; penalties.â 280 (3)âCOUNTERFEIT OR ALTERED TICKETS.âA Any person who: 281 (a)âKnowingly presents a counterfeit or altered state 282 lottery ticket; 283 (b)âKnowingly transfers a counterfeit or altered state 284 lottery ticket to another to present for payment; or 285 (c)âWith intent to defraud, falsely makes, alters, forges, 286 passes, or counterfeits a state lottery ticket; or 287 (d)âFiles with the department a claim for payment based 288 upon facts alleged by the claimant which facts are untrue and 289 known by the claimant to be untrue when the claim is made; 290 291 commits is guilty of a felony of the third degree, punishable as 292 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 293 (5)âFALSE CLAIM.âA person may not, when presenting or 294 causing to be presented any claim for payment or approval to an 295 officer or employee of the department or to a lottery retailer, 296 knowingly and willfully: 297 (a)âFalsify or conceal a material fact; 298 (b)âMake any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or 299 representation relating to a material fact; or 300 (c)âMake or use any false document, knowing the document 301 contains a false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or entry 302 relating to a material fact. 303 304 A person who violates this subsection commits a felony of the 305 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 306 or s. 775.084. 307 (6)âTHEFT OF LOTTERY TICKET BY RETAILER.â 308 (a)âA lottery retailer or an employee thereof may not use 309 his or her position to knowingly facilitate, participate in, or 310 otherwise assist in the theft of any lottery ticket from the 311 retail establishment or from a patron or customer of the retail 312 establishment. 313 (b)âA person who violates paragraph (a) commits a felony of 314 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 315 775.083, or s. 775.084. 316 (c)âAs used in this subsection, the terms âpatronâ and 317 âcustomerâ include a sworn law enforcement officer of the 318 Division of Security presenting a lottery ticket to a lottery 319 retailer to claim a prize during the performance of the law 320 enforcement officerâs official duties. 321 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.